Alaska, session 34, HB243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 08.13.030(b) is amended to read: 06 (b) The board shall 07 (1) examine applicants and authorize [APPROVE] the Department of 08 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development to issue [ISSUANCE OF] 09 licenses and permits to practice; 10 (2) authorize the Department of Commerce, Community, and 11 Economic Development to issue [ISSUANCE OF] licenses for schools of barbering, 12 hairdressing, manicuring, and esthetics; 13 (3) develop written instructions and notices that tattooing, permanent 14 cosmetic coloring, and body piercing shop owners and practitioners are required to 01 give or display under AS 08.13.215; 02 (4) enforce the provisions of this chapter, regulations adopted under 03 this chapter, and regulations relating to barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, 04 manicuring, and esthetics adopted under AS 44.46.020(a)(5)(C). 05 * Sec. 2. AS 08.13.030(c) is amended to read: 06 (c) The board may 07 (1) refuse to issue, suspend, or revoke a license or permit; 08 (2) on its own motion or upon receipt of a written complaint, conduct 09 hearings and request the 10 (A) Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic 11 Development to investigate the practices of a person, shop, or school involved 12 in the practice or teaching of barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, 13 manicuring, or esthetics; or 14 (B) Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic 15 Development or the Department of Environmental Conservation to investigate 16 the practices of a person, shop, or school involved in the practice or teaching of 17 body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetic coloring; 18 (3) adopt regulations or do any act necessary to carry out the 19 provisions of this chapter. 20 * Sec. 3. AS 08.13.110(d) is amended to read: 21 (d) The board shall authorize the issuance of [ISSUE] a license to a school of 22 manicuring if the school offers a curriculum of 12 hours of instruction or training 23 approved by the board that addresses health, safety, and hygiene concerns of 24 manicuring customers and practitioners that are relevant to the practice of manicuring. 25 A school of manicuring may offer instruction in addition to the 12 hours required for a 26 license, but the board may not authorize the issuance of [ISSUE] a license to a 27 school of manicuring if the school requires its students to complete more than 12 28 hours of the required instruction or training in health, safety, and hygiene concerns 29 before the school will certify that the student has completed the school's manicuring 30 course for purposes of AS 08.13.080(e). 31 * Sec. 4. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.